Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB500.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 13A.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all grants of authority to promulgate
administrative regulations, and no administrative regulation shall be promulgated or
adopted unless in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all other acts passed by the 1984
Session of the General Assembly.
(3) Any grant of authority for an administrative body to promulgate rules or standards
is repealed[,] unless authorized by this chapter.
(4) Any grant of authority for an administrative body to promulgate administrative
regulations which conflicts[is in conflict] with the provisions of this chapter shall
be repealed to the extent that it conflicts with the provisions of this chapter,
regardless of whether the grant of authority is broader than that contained in this
chapter.
(5) Any existing statute and any act passed by the 1984 Session of the General
Assembly which conflicts[is in conflict] with the provisions of this chapter is
repealed to the extent of the conflict.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:54 PM Jacketed